California, session 20252026, AB2374.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Supporting Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander students attending postsecondary educational institutions in California serves the interests of all Californians.(b) Historically, Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander students have faced discrimination and have been prevented from attending many colleges and universities due to explicit segregation and exclusionary policies.(c) Before the landmark United States Supreme Court case of Brown v. Board of Education of Topeka (1954) 347 U.S. 483, which declared that segregated schools were unconstitutional, racial segregation in education was common in the United States.(d) Title VI of the federal Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 2000d et seq.) continues to advance access and equality in education by prohibiting any person, on the ground of race, color, or national origin, from being excluded from participation in, being denied the benefits of, or being subject to discrimination under any program or activity receiving federal financial assistance.(e) Seventy years after the United States Supreme Court’s ruling in Brown v. Board of Education of Topeka (1954) 347 U.S. 483, barriers and disparities for Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander students in postsecondary education remain.(f) Nationally, college and university enrollment of Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander students continues to face challenges related to access and equity.(g) Federal designation of Asian American- and Native American Pacific Islander-Serving Institutions (AANAPISIs), which are public and private institutions in the United States that serve a significant population of Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander students, have an important history of supporting these diverse communities.(h) Today, AANAPISIs continue their vital mission of creating opportunities for Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander students, and racially diverse students, to earn a postsecondary degree in a culturally responsive environment.(i) According to federal data, there are numerous colleges and universities identified as AANAPISIs in the United States, which collectively serve hundreds of thousands of students from diverse Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander backgrounds.SEC. 2. Article 7.6 (commencing with Section 66077) is added to Chapter 2 of Part 40 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code, to read: Article 7.6. Designation of California Asian American- and Native Hawaiian Pacific Islander-Serving Institutions66077. This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the Designation of California Asian American- and Native Hawaiian Pacific Islander-Serving Institutions.66077.1. As used in this article, the following definitions apply:(a) “Applicant” means an eligible college or university that applies for a designation pursuant to this article.(b) “College or university” means a University of California, California State University, or California Community Colleges campus, or an independent institution of higher education. education, as defined in Section 66010.(c) “Governing board” means the governing board established pursuant to this article.(d) “Managing entity” means the ____ described in this article. office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.(e) “Normal time” means the time it would take a full-time student to complete the requirements for a degree or certificate offered by a college or university.(f) “Recipient” means a college or university that receives a designation pursuant to this article.66077.2. (a) The Designation of California Asian American- and Native Hawaiian Pacific Islander-Serving Institutions is hereby established to recognize colleges and universities that excel at providing academic resources to Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander students enrolled in degree or certificate programs offered by colleges and universities. This designation shall be awarded to qualifying applicants only by a two-thirds vote of approval by the governing board.(b) An initial designation awarded pursuant to this article shall be valid for five academic years. Thereafter, a recipient may submit an application for renewal. A renewal designation awarded pursuant to this article shall be valid for five years.(c) An applicant is eligible for designation pursuant to this article if the applicant meets all of the following requirements:(1) Submits an initial or renewal application, as applicable, to the managing entity on or before the application deadline established by the managing entity pursuant to Section 66077.3.(2) Meets either of the following, as applicable:(A) Submits an initial application that complies with subdivision (d).(B) Submits a renewal application that complies with subdivision (e).(3) Posts the initial or renewal application submitted pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (2), as applicable, on the applicant’s internet website.(d) An initial application shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(1) A certification, in writing, by the chief administrative officer of the college or university, of the applicant’s commitment to address Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander student success that is consistent with the applicant’s mission.(2) Academic goals for the applicant to achieve within the five-year period in which the initial designation awarded pursuant to this article shall be valid. The goals described in this paragraph shall improve retention, time-to-degree or time-to-certificate completion, and graduation rates of Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander students based on the data submitted by the applicant pursuant to paragraph (5) or (6), as applicable, within the five-year period in which the initial designation shall be valid.(3) Academic equity goals for the applicant to achieve within the five-year period in which the initial designation awarded pursuant to this article shall be valid. The goals described in this paragraph shall reduce the academic equity gaps in the retention, time-to-degree or time-to-certificate completion, and graduation rates between the applicant’s Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander students and the overall student population based on data submitted by the applicant pursuant to paragraph (5) or (6), as applicable.(4) A strategic plan for the five-year period in which the initial designation awarded pursuant to this article shall be valid, on how the applicant intends to meet the academic goals and academic equity goals submitted pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3). The strategic plan shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(A) A mission statement that addresses the applicant’s commitment to serve Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander students.(B) Outreach services to Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander students to encourage them to enroll at the college or university.(C) Academic and basic needs support services to assist in the academic success of Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander students. Support services described in this subparagraph may include campus affinity centers and corequisite coursework or concurrent support activities.(D) An outline of the planned allocation of resources during the five-year period in which the initial designation awarded pursuant to this article shall be valid, to ensure that the strategic plan described in this paragraph can be implemented.(E) An outline of how the applicant will use existing resources to provide culturally relevant professional development to the applicant’s faculty and staff.(F) Academic curriculum, including incorporating and expanding curriculum and course offerings in ethnic studies and other culturally responsive coursework to reflect the diverse backgrounds of Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander students and to support their academic engagement and retention.(G) Research initiatives, including institutional research to address the needs of lived experiences of Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander populations, both on campus and in the broader community.(H) Data disaggregation collection and analysis to identify and address the distinct needs and achievement gaps of diverse Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander ethnic subgroups.(I) Intersegmental collaboration with the University of California, the California State University, the California Community Colleges, and independent nonprofit university institutions of higher education to strengthen the educational pipeline for Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander students, including support for transfer and the completion of undergraduate, graduate, and professional degrees.(5) A four-year college or university applicant shall submit, in its application, graduation rates for the previous three academic years for all students, and for Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander students, within the normal time and up to 150 percent of the normal time-to-degree completion, yield, retention, and graduation rate. To the extent possible, the graduation rates for Native Hawaiian and Pacific Islander students shall be reported as a separate category.(6) A community college applicant shall submit, in its application,					 either both of the following for the previous three academic years:(A) The number of degree and certificate programs completed by all students, and by Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander students. To the extent possible, the number of degree and certificate programs completed by Native Hawaiian and Pacific Islander students shall be reported as a separate category.(B) The student transfer rates for all students, and for Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander students, to four-year colleges and universities. To the extent possible, the student transfer rates for Native Hawaiian and Pacific Islander students shall be reported as a separate category.(7) A description of campus resources to promote a campus of equity and inclusion for Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander students.(e) A renewal application shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(1) Either of the following, as applicable:(A) An applicant seeking renewal upon expiration of an initial designation awarded pursuant to this article shall resubmit the application it submitted to receive that initial designation.(B) An applicant seeking renewal upon expiration of a renewal designation awarded pursuant to this article shall resubmit the application it submitted to receive that previous renewal designation.(2) Demonstration of the applicant’s progress to achieve the academic goals and academic equity goals provided in the application submitted pursuant to paragraph (1).(3) Demonstration of the applicant’s progress to implement the strategic plan provided in the application submitted pursuant to paragraph (1).(4) Any changes made by the applicant to either of the following items provided in the application submitted pursuant to paragraph (1):(A) The mission statement in the strategic plan that addresses the applicant’s commitment to serve Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander students.(B) The description of campus resources to promote a campus of equity and inclusion for Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander students.(5) A certification, in writing, by the chief administrative officer of the college or university, of the applicant’s continual commitment to address Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander student success that is consistent with the applicant’s mission.(6) Academic goals for the applicant to achieve within the five-year period in which the renewal designation shall be valid. The goals described in this paragraph shall improve retention, time-to-degree or time-to-certificate completion, and graduation rates of Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander students based on the data submitted by the applicant pursuant to paragraph (9) or (10), as applicable, within the five-year period in which the renewal designation shall be valid.(7) Academic equity goals for the applicant to achieve within the five-year period in which the renewal designation shall be valid. The goals described in this paragraph shall reduce the academic equity gaps in the retention, time-to-degree or time-to-certificate completion, and graduation rates between the applicant’s Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander students and the overall student population based on data submitted by the applicant pursuant to paragraph (9) or (10), as applicable.(8) A strategic plan for the five-year period in which the renewal designation shall be valid, on how the applicant intends to meet the academic goals and academic equity goals submitted pursuant to paragraphs (6) and (7). The strategic plan shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(A) Outreach services to Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander students to encourage them to enroll at the college or university.(B) Academic and basic needs support services to assist in the academic success of Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander students. Support services described in this subparagraph may include campus affinity centers and corequisite coursework or concurrent support activities.(C) An outline of the planned allocation of resources for the five-year period in which the renewal designation shall be valid, to ensure that the strategic plan described in this paragraph can be implemented.(D) An outline of how the applicant will use existing resources to provide culturally relevant professional development to the applicant’s faculty and staff.(E) Academic curriculum, including incorporating and expanding curriculum and course offerings in ethnic studies and other culturally responsive coursework to reflect the diverse backgrounds of Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander students and to support their academic engagement and retention.(F) Research initiatives, including institutional research to address the needs of lived experiences of Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander populations, both on campus and in the broader community.(G) Data disaggregation collection and analysis to identify and address the distinct needs and achievement gaps of diverse Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander ethnic subgroups.(H) Intersegmental collaboration with the University of California, the California State University, the California Community Colleges, and independent nonprofit institutions of higher education to strengthen the educational pipeline for Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander students, including support for transfer and the completion of undergraduate, graduate, and professional degrees.(9) A four-year college or university applicant shall submit, in its application, graduation rates for the previous five academic years for all students, and for Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander students, within the normal time and up to 150 percent of normal time-to-degree completion, yield, retention, and graduation rate. To the extent possible, the graduation rates for Native Hawaiian and Pacific Islander students shall be reported as a separate category.(10) A community college campus shall submit, in its application, either both of the following for the previous five academic years:(A) The number of degree or certificate programs completed by all students, and by Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander students. To the extent possible, the number of degree or certificate programs completed by Native Hawaiian and Pacific Islander students shall be reported as a separate category.(B) The student transfer rates for all students, and for Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander students, to four-year colleges and universities. To the extent possible, the student transfer rates for Native Hawaiian and Pacific Islander students shall be reported as a separate category.(f) (1) If an applicant’s renewal application is denied by the governing board, the applicant may submit only an application to receive an initial designation pursuant to this article.(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), an applicant described in paragraph (1) may submit an application for a renewal designation following the award of a subsequent initial designation by the governing board pursuant to this article.(g) An applicant is encouraged to inform and consult with the academic senate of the college or university on the applicant’s initial and renewal applications prepared pursuant to this article.66077.3. The ____ office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges is hereby designated as the managing entity for initial and renewal designations pursuant to this article. The managing entity shall act as a neutral administrative body with all of the following duties:(a) Developing application processes that contain the requirements described in Section 66077.2 for applicants.(b) Accepting initial and renewal applications from applicants. The managing entity shall set two one application deadlines deadline each year on dates a date determined by the managing entity.(c) Processing each application received and presenting those applications to the governing board twice at least once each year on dates a date determined by the governing board. board, but the governing board may hold additional meetings to review additional applications at the discretion of the governing board.(d) Upon the governing board’s approval or denial of an applicant’s application, informing the applicant of this outcome.(e) Preparing and delivering to an applicant approved by the governing board to receive a designation pursuant to this article an appropriate insignia recognizing the designation.66077.4. (a) The governing board of the California Asian American- and Native Hawaiian Pacific Islander-Serving Institutions is hereby established. The purpose of the governing board is to award colleges and universities with designations pursuant to this article based on applications presented by the managing entity pursuant to Section 66074.3.(b) (1) The governing board shall be composed of all of the following eight members:(A) The Lieutenant Governor, or the Lieutenant Governor’s designee.(B) One member of the public, to be appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.(C) One member of the public, to be appointed by the President pro Tempore of the Senate.(D) A designee of the President of the University of California.(E) A designee of the Chancellor of the California State University.(F) A designee of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.(G) A designee of the Association of Independent California Colleges and Universities.(H) The chair of the California Asian American & Pacific Islander (AAPI) Legislative Caucus, or the chair’s designee.(2) Any designee described in paragraph (1) shall be qualified to make decisions on behalf of that appointed position.(3) A member of the public appointed pursuant to paragraph (1) by either the Speaker of the Assembly or the President pro Tempore of the Senate shall serve a two-year term.(4) It is the intent of the Legislature that in appointing members of the public pursuant to paragraph (1), the appointing authority shall make every effort to ensure that the membership of the governing board includes persons who have a strong interest in the further development and improvement of the academic success of Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander students.(c) For purposes of the first two years of the governing board’s operations, the chair of the governing board shall be the Lieutenant Governor or the Lieutenant Governor’s designee. The governing board shall select each subsequent chairperson from within its membership by a vote of two-thirds of the governing board’s voting members.(d) The governing board shall complete both of the following actions:(1) Convene twice a year to vote on the approval or denial of applications. at least once each year to vote on the approval or denial of new or renewal applications that have been submitted to the managing entity at least 30 days before the meeting. The governing board may schedule additional meetings, as necessary.(2) Approve or deny each application presented by the managing entity pursuant to Section 66077.3.(e) All decisions made by the governing board shall require a two-thirds vote of approval by the governing board members who are present for the vote.(f) The governing board shall be subject to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).